particles/letter.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Letters and initials
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Let +Initial

LEXICON Root
a	Lower;	A	Upper;
b	Lower;	B	Upper;
c	Lower;	C	Upper;
d	Lower;	D	Upper;
e	Lower;	E	Upper;
f	Lower;	F	Upper;
g	Lower;	G	Upper;
h	Lower;	H	Upper;
i	Lower;	I	Upper;
j	Lower;	J	Upper;
k	Lower;	K	Upper;
l	Lower;	L	Upper;
m	Lower;	M	Upper;
n	Lower;	N	Upper;
o	Lower;	O	Upper;
p	Lower;	P	Upper;
q	Lower;	Q	Upper;
r	Lower;	R	Upper;
s	Lower;	S	Upper;
t	Lower;	T	Upper;
u	Lower;	U	Upper;
v	Lower;	V	Upper;
w	Lower;	W	Upper;
x	Lower;	X	Upper;
y	Lower;	Y	Upper;
z	Lower;	Z	Upper;
ß	Lower;
à	Lower;	À	Upper;
á	Lower;	Á	Upper;
â	Lower;	Â	Upper;
ã	Lower;	Ã	Upper;
ä	Lower;	Ä	Upper;
å	Lower;	Å	Upper;
æ	Lower;	Æ	Upper;
ç	Lower;	Ç	Upper;
è	Lower;	È	Upper;
é	Lower;	É	Upper;
ê	Lower;	Ê	Upper;
ë	Lower;	Ë	Upper;
ì	Lower;	Ì	Upper;
í	Lower;	Í	Upper;
î	Lower;	Î	Upper;
ï	Lower;	Ï	Upper;
ð	Lower;	Ð	Upper;
ñ	Lower;	Ñ	Upper;
ò	Lower;	Ò	Upper;
ó	Lower;	Ó	Upper;
ô	Lower;	Ô	Upper;
õ	Lower;	Õ	Upper;
ö	Lower;	Ö	Upper;
ø	Lower;	Ø	Upper;
ù	Lower;	Ù	Upper;
ú	Lower;	Ú	Upper;
û	Lower;	Û	Upper;
ü	Lower;	Ü	Upper;
ý	Lower;	Ý	Upper;
þ	Lower;	Þ	Upper;
ÿ	Lower;	Ÿ	Upper;
š	Lower;	Š	Upper;
ž	Lower;	Ž	Upper;
œ	Lower;	Œ	Upper;

LEXICON Lower
+Let:0	#;

LEXICON Upper
+Let:0	#;
+Initial:.	#;
